pt-PT: Mobiliário > Carrinhos e ilhas: Carrinhos de bagagem; Ilhas
pl: Meble > Wózki i wyspy: Wózki; Wyspy
sl-SI: Pohištvo > Vozički in otoki: Vozički; Otoki
ru: Мебель > Тележки и острова: Кухонные тележки; Кухонные острова
ro-RO: Mobilier > Cărucioare și corpuri de mobilier tip insulă: Cărucioare; Corpuri de mobilier tip insulă
th: เฟอร์นิเจอร์ > โต๊ะเตรียมอาหารและรถเข็นอาหาร: รถเข็น; โต๊ะกลางห้อง
it: Arredamento > Carrelli e isole: Carrelli; Isole
hr-HR: Namještaj > Kolica i otoci: Kolica; Otoci
el: Έπιπλα > Καρότσια & νησίδες: Καρότσια; Νησίδες
vi: Đồ gỗ > Tủ gỗ có chân đẩy: Xe đẩy; Đảo bếp có mặt gấp
fr: Meubles > Chariots et îlots: Chariot; Îles
cs: Nábytek > Policové vozíky: Vozíky; Kuchyňské ostrůvky
de: Möbel > Kücheninseln & Küchenwagen: Wagen; Inseln
sk-SK: Nábytok > Vozíky a ostrovčeky: Vozíky; Ostrovčeky
en: Furniture > Carts & Islands: Carts; Islands
bg-BG: Мебели > Колички и острови: Колички; Острови
fi: Huonekalut > Apupöydät ja saarekkeet: Kärryt; Saarekkeet
ja: 家具 > ワゴン: カート; アイランド
es: Mobiliario > Carros e islas: Carros; Islas
nl: Meubelen > Trolleys: Karren; Eilanden
lt-LT: Baldai > Vežimėliai ir salos: Vežimėliai; Salos
hu: Bútor > Szekerek és szigetek: Szekerek; Szigetek
nb: Møbler > Vogner og øyer: Vogner; Øyer
da: Møbler > Vogne og køkkenøer: Vogne; Køkkenøer
tr: Mobilyalar > Tekerlekli Servis Sehpaları ve Mutfak Adaları: Tekerlekli Servis Sehpaları; Adalar
zh-CN: 家具 > 可移动置物架: 小推车; 厨房岛
pt-BR: Móveis > Carrinhos: Carrinho de mão; Ilhas
ko: 가구 > 카트/아일랜드: 카트; 아일랜드
zh-TW: 家具 > 中島/推車: 推車; 中島吧台桌
sv: Möbler > Rullbord: Vagnar; Öar